New York, session 2025-2026, A4452.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The parks, recreation and historic preservation law is 2 amended by adding a new section 13.08 to read as follows: 3 § 13.08 Retail goods produced in the United States. All goods, except 4 foods and food products, sold at retail upon the premises of a state 5 park, recreational facility or historic site shall be produced or manu- 6 factured in the United States as determined pursuant to the regulations 7 of the commissioner of general services. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 9 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07178-01-5